Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.045

Members—Removal from commission—Process.

If a commission member fails or refuses to perform his or her duties due to excessive absence or abandonment of his or her position or engages in any acts of dishonesty or willful misconduct, the commission may recommend to the director that the commission member be removed from his or her position on the commission. Upon receiving such recommendation, the director shall review the matter, including any statement from the commission member who is the subject of the recommendation, and determine whether adequate cause for removal is present. If the director finds that adequate cause for removal exists, the director shall remove the member from his or her commission position. The position shall then be declared vacant and must be filled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for filling vacancies.

[ 2008 c 11 s 3.]